ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Accesorii și piese pentru aparate de fitness > Accesorii și piese pentru benzi de alergare: Curele pentru benzi de alergare; Module Bluetooth pentru benzi de alergare; Console pentru benzi de alergare; Huse pentru benzi de alergare; Platforme pentru benzi de alergare; Adaptoare Hirise pentru benzi de alergare; Taste pentru benzi de alergare; Suporturi pentru laptop pentru benzi de alergare; Plăci de comandă inferioare pentru benzi de alergare; Lubrifianți pentru benzi de alergare; Curele motor pentru benzi de alergare; Motoare pentru benzi de alergare; Balustrade pentru benzi de alergare; Telecomenzi pentru benzi de alergare; Piese de schimb pentru benzi de alergare; Senzori de viteză pentru benzi de alergare; Plăci de comandă superioare pentru benzi de alergare; Module Wifi pentru benzi de alergare
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Acessórios e peças para máquinas de cardio > Acessórios e peças para esteira: Correias para esteira; Módulos Bluetooth para esteira; Consoles para esteira; Capas para esteiras; Plataformas para esteiras; Adaptadores Hirise para esteira; Chaves para esteira; Suportes para laptop em esteira; Placas de controle inferiores para esteira; Lubrificantes para esteiras; Correias de motor da esteira; Motores de esteira; Trilhos para esteira; Controles remotos para esteiras; Peças de reposição para esteira; Sensores de velocidade para esteira; Placas de controle superiores para esteira; Módulos Wi-Fi para esteira
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Tillbehör och delar till konditionsträningsmaskiner > Tillbehör och delar till löpband: Löpbandsbälten; Bluetooth-moduler till löpband; Löpbandskonsoler; Överdrag för löpband; Löpbandsdäck; Upphöjningsadaptrar för löpband; Löpbandsnycklar; Löpbandsstativ för bärbar dator; Nedre styrpaneler för löpband; Smörjmedel för löpband; Motorbälten för löpband; Löpbandsmotorer; Löpbandsräcken; Fjärrkontroller för löpband; Reservdelar till löpband; Hastighetssensorer för löpband; Övre styrpaneler för löpband; Wi-Fi-moduler för löpband
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > カーディオマシン関連用品・部品 > トレッドミル関連用品・部品: トレッドミルベルト; トレッドミルBluetoothモジュール; トレッドミルコンソール; トレッドミル用カバー; トレッドミル用デッキ; トレッドミルハイライズアダプター; トレッドミルキー; トレッドミルラップトップスタンド; トレッドミル下部コントロールボード; トレッドミル用潤滑剤; トレッドミルモーターベルト; トレッドミルモーター; トレッドミルレール; トレッドミル用リモコン; トレッドミル交換部品; トレッドミル速度センサー; トレッドミル上部コントロールボード; トレッドミルWifiモジュール
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kestävyysurheilulaitteiden lisätarvikkeet ja -osat > Juoksumaton lisätarvikkeet ja -osat: Juoksumaton hihnat; Juoksumaton Bluetooth-moduulit; Juoksumaton konsolit; Juoksumattojen suojukset; Juoksumattojen alustat; Juoksumaton Hirise-sovittimet; Juoksumaton avaimet; Juoksumaton kannettavan tietokoneen telineet; Juoksumaton alemmat hallintalevyt; Juoksumattojen voiteluaineet; Juoksumaton moottorihihnat; Juoksumaton moottorit; Juoksumaton kaiteet; Juoksumattojen kaukosäätimet; Juoksumaton varaosat; Juoksumaton nopeusanturit; Juoksumaton ylemmät hallintalevyt; Juoksumaton wifimoduulit
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Zubehör und Teile für Cardiogeräte > Zubehör und Teile für Laufbänder: Laufband-Bänder; Bluetooth-Module für Laufbänder; Konsolen für Laufbänder; Laufband-Abdeckungen; Laufband-Decks; Hirise-Adapter für Laufbänder; Laufbandschlüssel; Laufband-Laptopständer; Untere Steuerplatinen für Laufbänder; Laufband-Schmiermittel; Laufband-Motorriemen; Laufband-Motoren; Laufbandgeländer; Laufband-Fernbedienungen; Ersatzteile für Laufbänder; Geschwindigkeitssensoren für Laufbänder; Obere Steuerplatinen für Laufbänder; WLAN-Module für Laufbänder
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Accessoires en onderdelen voor cardioapparaten > Accessoires en onderdelen voor tredmolens: Riemen voor tredmolens; Bluetoothmodules voor tredmolens; Consoles voor tredmolens; Loopbandhoezen; Loopbanddekken; Hirise-adapters voor tredmolens; Toetsen voor tredmolens; Laptopstandaards voor tredmolens; Lagere bedieningspanelen voor tredmolens; Loopbandsmeermiddelen; Motorriemen voor tredmolens; Motoren voor tredmolens; Rails voor tredmolens; Loopbandafstandsbedieningen; Vervangingsonderdelen voor tredmolens; Snelheidssensoren voor tredmolens; Hogere bedieningspanelen voor tredmolens; Wifimodules voor tredmolens
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Аксесоари и части за машини за кардио > Аксесоари и части за бягащи пътеки: Ленти за бягащи пътеки; Bluetooth модули за бягащи пътеки; Конзоли за бягащи пътеки; Покривала за бягаща пътека; Платформи за бягаща пътека; Адаптери за наклон за бягащи пътеки; Ключове за бягащи пътеки; Стойки за лаптоп за бягащи пътеки; Платки за управление на долната част на бягащи пътеки; Смазки за бягащи пътеки; Ремъци за мотор за бягащи пътеки; Мотори за бягащи пътеки; Парапети за бягащи пътеки; Дистанционни управления за бягащи пътеки; Резервни части за бягащи пътеки; Сензори за скорост за бягащи пътеки; Платки за управление на горната част на бягащи пътеки; Wi-Fi модули за бягащи пътеки
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makinesi Aksesuarları ve Parçaları > Koşu Bandı Aksesuarları ve Parçaları: Koşu Bandı Kemerleri; Koşu Bandı Bluetooth Modülleri; Koşu Bandı Konsolları; Koşu bandı kılıfları; Koşu bandı tahtaları; Koşu Bandı Hirise Adaptörleri; Koşu Bandı Tuşları; Koşu Bandı Dizüstü Bilgisayar Sehpaları; Koşu Bandı Alt Kontrol Kartları; Koşu bandı yağları; Koşu Bandı Motor Kayışları; Koşu Bandı Motorları; Koşu Bandı Rayları; Koşu bandı uzaktan kumandaları; Koşu Bandı Yedek Parçaları; Koşu Bandı Hız Sensörleri; Koşu Bandı Üst Kontrol Kartları; Koşu Bandı Wifi Modülleri
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Tilbehør og dele til cardiomaskiner > Løbebånd – tilbehør og dele: Løbebånd – bånd; Løbebånd – Bluetooth-moduler; Løbebånd – konsoller; Overtræk til løbebånd; Løbeplader til løbebånd; Løbebånd – hirise-adaptere; Løbebånd – nøgler; Løbebånd – computerholdere; Løbebånd – nedre kontroltavler; Smøremidler til løbebånd; Løbebånd – motorbånd; Løbebånd – motorer; Løbebånd – skinner; Fjernbetjeninger til løbebånd; Løbebånd – reservedele; Løbebånd – hastighedssensorer; Løbebånd – øvre kontroltavler; Løbebånd – Wi-Fi-moduler
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Pribor i dijelovi za kardio sprave > Dodaci i dijelovi za trake za trčanje: Gazni sloj za trake za trčanje; Bluetooth moduli na traci za trčanje; Konzole za trake za trčanje; Navlake za trake za trčanje; Gazne daske za trake za trčanje; Adapteri za trake za trčanje; Sigurnosni ključevi za trake za trčanje; Stalci za prijenosna računala za trčanje; Donje upravljačke ploče na traci za trčanje; Maziva za traku za trčanje; Pogonski remeni za trake za trčanje; Motori za trake za trčanje; Rukohvati za trake za trčanje; Upravljanje na daljinu za traku za trčanje; Zamjenski dijelovi trake za trčanje; Senzori brzine trake za trčanje; Gornje upravljačke ploče na traci za trčanje; Wifi moduli trake za trčanje
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Tilbehør og deler til kardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og deler til tredemøller: Belter til tredemøller; Bluetooth-moduler til tredemøller; Konsoller til tredemøller; Trekk for tredemøller; Løpeplater for tredemøller; Hirise-adaptere til tredemøller; Nøkler til tredemøller; Datamaskinstativer til tredemøller; Nedre kontrollbrett til tredemøller; Smøremidler for tredemøller; Motorbelter til tredemøller; Motorer til tredemøller; Skinner til tredemøller; Fjernkontroller for tredemøller; Reservedeler til tredemøller; Hastighetssensorer til tredemøller; Øvre kontrollbrett til tredemøller; Wifi-moduler til tredemøller
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažery – příslušenství a díly > Běžecké trenažéry – příslušenství a díly: Běžecké trenažéry – pásy; Běžecké trenažéry – Bluetooth moduly; Běžecké trenažéry – konzoly; Obaly na běžecké pásy; Desky k běžeckým pásům; Běžecké trenažéry – adaptéry náklonu; Běžecké trenažéry – klíče; Běžecké trenažéry – stojany na notebook; Běžecké trenažéry – dolní ovládací desky; Maziva na běžecké pásy; Běžecké trenažéry – řemeny motoru; Běžecké trenažéry – motory; Běžecké trenažéry – madla; Dálková ovládání k běžeckým pásům; Náhradní díly pro běžecký pás; Snímače rychlosti pro běžecký pás; Běžecké trenažéry – horní ovládací desky; Wifi moduly pro běžecký pás
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动器械配件/零件 > 跑步机配件/零件: 跑步机皮带; 跑步机蓝牙模块; 跑步机控制台; 跑步机防尘罩; 跑步机跑板; 跑步机 Hirise 适配器; 跑步机按键; 跑步机笔记本电脑支架; 跑步机下控制板; 跑步机润滑油; 跑步机电机皮带; 跑步机电机; 跑步机导轨; 跑步机遥控器; 跑步机替换零件; 跑步机速度传感器; 跑步机上控制板; 跑步机 Wifi 模块
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Accesorios y piezas para máquinas cardiovasculares > Accesorios y piezas para cintas de correr: Cinturones de cinta de correr; Módulos Bluetooth para cinta de correr; Consolas para cintas de correr; Fundas para caminadoras; Tablas para caminadoras; Adaptadores Hirise para cintas de correr; Teclas de la cinta de correr; Soportes para portátil para cinta de correr; Tableros de control inferiores de la cinta de correr; Lubricantes para caminadoras; Correas de motor para cinta de correr; Motores para cintas de correr; Rieles para cinta de correr; Controles remotos para caminadoras; Piezas de repuesto para cinta de correr; Sensores de velocidad de cinta de correr; Tableros de control superiores para cinta de correr; Módulos Wifi para cinta de correr
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Accessori e ricambi per macchine cardio > Accessori e parti del tapis roulant: Cinghie per tapis roulant; Moduli Bluetooth per tapis roulant; Console per tapis roulant; Coperture per tapis roulant; Tavole per tapis roulant; Adattatori Hirise per tapis roulant; Tasti del tapis roulant; Supporti per laptop su tapis roulant; Schede di controllo inferiori del tapis roulant; Lubrificanti per tapis roulant; Cinghie motore del tapis roulant; Motori per tapis roulant; Rotaie del tapis roulant; Telecomandi per tapis roulant; Parti di ricambio per tapis roulant; Sensori di velocità del tapis roulant; Schede di controllo superiori del tapis roulant; Moduli Wi-Fi per tapis roulant
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruoklių priedai ir dalys > Bėgimo takelių priedai ir dalys: Bėgimo takelių diržai; Bėgimo takelių „Bluetooth“ moduliai; Bėgimo takelių konsolės; Bėgimo takelių uždangalai; Bėgimo takelių platformos; Bėgimo takelių „Hirise“ adapteriai; Bėgimo takelių saugos raktai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių stovai bėgimo takeliams; Bėgimo takelių apatinės valdymo plokštės; Bėgimo takelių tepalai; Bėgimo takelių variklių diržai; Bėgimo takelių varikliai; Bėgimo takelių bėgiai; Bėgimo takelių nuotolinio valdymo pultai; Bėgimo takelių atsarginės dalys; Bėgimo takelių greičio jutikliai; Bėgimo takelių viršutinės valdymo plokštės; Bėgimo takelių „Wifi“ moduliai
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材配件/零件 > 跑步機配件/零件: 跑步機皮帶; 跑步機藍牙模組; 跑步機控制台; 跑步機保護套; 跑步機跑板; 跑步機高度轉接器; 跑步機按鍵; 跑步機筆記型電腦支架; 跑步機下部控制板; 跑步機潤滑劑; 跑步機馬達皮帶; 跑步機馬達; 跑步機軌道; 跑步機遙控器; 跑步機替換零件; 跑步機速度感測器; 跑步機上部控制板; 跑步機 Wifi 模組
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Dodatki in deli za kardio naprave > Dodatki in deli za tekalne steze: Jermeni za tekalne steze; Brezžični moduli za tekalne steze; Konzole za tekalne steze; Pokrivala za tekalne steze; Ploščadi za tekalne steze; Višinski adapterji za tekalne steze; Varnostni ključi za tekalne steze; Stojala za prenosne računalnike za tekalne steze; Spodnje krmilne plošče za tekalne steze; Maziva za tekalne steze; Pogonski jermeni za tekalne steze; Motorji za tekalne steze; Držala za tekalne steze; Daljinski upravljalniki za tekalne steze; Nadomestni deli za tekalne steze; Senzorji hitrosti za tekalne steze; Zgornje krmilne plošče za tekalne steze; Moduli Wifi za tekalne steze
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek > Futópad-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek: Futópadövek; Futópad Bluetooth-modulok; Futópadkonzolok; Futópad takaróponyvák; Futópad futólapok; Futópadmagasító adapterek; Futópadgombok; Futópad-laptopállványok; Futópad alsó vezérlőtáblák; Futópad kenőanyagok; Futópad-motorszíjak; Futópadmotorok; Futópadsínek; Futópad távirányítók; Futópad-cserealkatrészek; Futópad-sebességérzékelők; Futópad felső vezérlőtáblák; Futópad Wifi-modulok
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para máquina de cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para passadeira rolante: Correias para passadeira rolante; Módulos Bluetooth para passadeira rolante; Consolas para passadeira rolante; Capas para passadeiras; Plataformas para passadeiras; Adaptadores Hirise para passadeira rolante; Chaves para passadeira rolante; Suportes de portátil para passadeira rolante; Placas de controlo inferiores para passadeira rolante; Lubrificantes para passadeiras; Correias de motor para passadeira rolante; Motores para passadeira rolante; Corrimões para passadeiras rolantes; Comandos remotos para passadeiras; Peças de substituição para passadeira rolante; Sensores de velocidade para passadeira rolante; Placas de controlo superiores para passadeiras rolantes; Módulos Wi-Fi para passadeira rolante
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machine Accessories & Parts > Treadmill Accessories & Parts: Treadmill Belts; Treadmill Bluetooth Modules; Treadmill Consoles; Treadmill Covers; Treadmill Decks; Treadmill Hirise Adapters; Treadmill Keys; Treadmill Laptop Stands; Treadmill Lower Control Boards; Treadmill Lubricants; Treadmill Motor Belts; Treadmill Motors; Treadmill Rails; Treadmill Remote Controls; Treadmill Replacement Parts; Treadmill Speed Sensors; Treadmill Upper Control Boards; Treadmill Wifi Modules
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Аксессуары и детали для кардиотренажеров > Аксессуары и детали для беговых дорожек: Полотна для беговых дорожек; Bluetooth-модули для беговых дорожек; Консоли для беговых дорожек; Чехлы для беговых дорожек; Деки для беговых дорожек; Адаптеры для поднятия беговой дорожки; Ключи безопасности для беговых дорожек; Подставки для ноутбуков для беговых дорожек; Нижние платы управления для беговых дорожек; Смазки для беговых дорожек; Приводные ремни двигателя для беговых дорожек; Двигатели для беговых дорожек; Поручни для беговых дорожек; Пульты управления для беговых дорожек; Запасные детали для беговых дорожек; Датчики скорости для беговых дорожек; Верхние панели управления для беговых дорожек; Модули Wi-Fi для беговых дорожек
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & ανταλλακτικά για μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ και εξαρτήματα διαδρόμων γυμναστικής: Ιμάντες για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Μονάδες Bluetooth για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Κονσόλες για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Καλύμματα διαδρόμων γυμναστικής; Δάπεδα διαδρόμων γυμναστικής; Προσαρμογείς ανύψωσης για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Κλειδιά ασφαλείας για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Βάσεις φορητού υπολογιστή για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Κάτω πίνακες ελέγχου για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Λιπαντικά διαδρόμων γυμναστικής; Ιμάντες κινητήρα για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Μοτέρ για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Ράγες για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Τηλεχειριστήρια διαδρόμων γυμναστικής; Ανταλλακτικά για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Αισθητήρες ταχύτητας για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Άνω πίνακες ελέγχου για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής; Μονάδες WiFi για διαδρόμους γυμναστικής
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องคาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่ลู่วิ่ง: สายพานลู่วิ่ง; โมดูลบลูทูธลู่วิ่ง; คอนโซลลู่วิ่ง; ผ้าคลุมลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า; กระดานลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า; อะแดปเตอร์ Hirise ของลู่วิ่ง; กุญแจลู่วิ่ง; ขาตั้งแล็ปท็อปลู่วิ่ง; แผงควบคุมส่วนล่างของลู่วิ่ง; น้ำมันหล่อลื่นลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า; สายพานมอเตอร์ลู่วิ่ง; มอเตอร์ลู่วิ่ง; รางลู่วิ่ง; รีโมทคอนโทรลลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า; ชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่ลู่วิ่ง; เซ็นเซอร์ความเร็วลู่วิ่ง; แผงควบคุมส่วนบนของลู่วิ่ง; โมดูลไวไฟของลู่วิ่ง
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 카디오 머신 부대용품/부품 > 트레드밀 부대용품/부품: 트레드밀 벨트; 트레드밀 블루투스 모듈; 트레드밀 콘솔; 러닝머신 커버; 러닝머신 데크; 트레드밀 하이라이즈 어댑터; 트레드밀 안전 키; 트레드밀 랩톱 스탠드; 트레드밀 하부 컨트롤 보드; 러닝머신 윤활유; 트레드밀 모터 벨트; 트레드밀 모터; 트레드밀 레일; 러닝머신 리모컨; 트레드밀 교체용 부품; 트레드밀 속도 센서; 트레드밀 상부 컨트롤 보드; 트레드밀 Wi-Fi 모듈
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy tập tim mạch > Phụ kiện & bộ phận máy tập chạy bộ: Đai máy chạy bộ; Mô-đun Bluetooth của máy chạy bộ; Bảng điều khiển máy chạy bộ; Vỏ bọc máy chạy bộ; Mặt bàn máy chạy bộ; Bộ điều hợp Hirise máy chạy bộ; Chìa khóa máy chạy bộ; Giá đỡ máy tính xách tay trên máy chạy bộ; Bảng điều khiển phía dưới máy chạy bộ; Dầu bôi trơn máy chạy bộ; Dây đai động cơ máy chạy bộ; Động cơ máy chạy bộ; Tay vịn máy chạy bộ; Điều khiển từ xa máy chạy bộ; Phụ tùng thay thế cho máy chạy bộ; Cảm biến tốc độ máy chạy bộ; Bảng điều khiển phía trên máy chạy bộ; Mô-đun Wifi máy chạy bộ
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Akcesoria i części do urządzeń cardio > Akcesoria i części do bieżni: Pasy do bieżni; Moduły Bluetooth do bieżni; Konsole do bieżni; Pokrowce na bieżnie; Blaty do bieżni; Adaptery kąta pochylania do bieżni; Zrywki do bieżni; Stojaki na laptopa do bieżni; Dolne płyty sterujące bieżni; Smary do bieżni; Pasy silnikowe do bieżni; Silniki do bieżni; Poręcze do bieżni; Piloty do bieżni; Części zamienne do bieżni; Czujniki prędkości bieżni; Górne płyty sterujące bieżni; Moduły Wi-Fi do bieżni
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour machines cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour tapis roulant: Ceintures de tapis roulant; Modules Bluetooth pour tapis roulant; Consoles de tapis roulant; Housses pour tapis de course; Planches pour tapis de course; Adaptateurs Hirise pour tapis roulant; Clés de tapis roulant; Supports pour ordinateur portable pour tapis roulant; Tableaux de commande inférieurs de tapis roulant; Lubrifiants pour tapis de course; Courroies de moteur de tapis roulant; Moteurs de tapis roulant; Rails de tapis roulant; Télécommandes pour tapis de course; Pièces de rechange pour tapis roulant; Capteurs de vitesse de tapis roulant; Tableaux de commande supérieurs de tapis roulant; Modules Wi-Fi pour tapis roulant
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Príslušenstvo a diely kardio prístrojov > Príslušenstvo a diely pre bežecké pásy: Pásy na bežeckom páse; Moduly Bluetooth na bežeckom páse; Konzoly na bežeckom páse; Obaly bežeckých pásov; Plošiny bežeckých pásov; Adaptéry HiRise pre bežecké pásy; Kľúče na bežecké pásy; Stojany na notebooky pre bežecké pásy; Spodné ovládacie panely bežeckého pásu; Mazivá na bežecké pásy; Bežiace pásy; Motory bežiacich pásov; Koľajnice na bežecký pás; Diaľkové ovládače pre bežecké pásy; Náhradné diely pre bežecké pásy; Snímače rýchlosti na bežeckom páse; Horné ovládacie panely bežeckého pásu; Wifi moduly na bežeckom páse